Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Sections 107-1 to 107-11 designated as Part I by L 2007, c
82, §3.

§107-1 Management of internal improvements.
The comptroller is charged with the superintendence and management of the
internal improvements of the State. [CC 1859, §167; RL 1925, §798; RL 1935,
§1700; RL 1945, §4901; am L 1947, c 180, §1; RL 1955, §110-1; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §12; HRS §107-1]

Cross References

General authority of comptroller, see §26-6.

Case Notes

Section gives no right to grant franchise for street railway
in Honolulu. 6 H. 414.

Within duties to accept promise to pay for use of sewer. 19
H. 41.

County ordinances may not restrict duties under section. 23
H. 675.

No specific duties or improvements are imposed on contractors.
30 H. 132.

Cited: 7 H. 470.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next